Utah statutes.
53-2-509.   Personnel responding to requests for assistance.

(1)  Each person or entity holding a license, certificate, or other permit evidencing qualification in a professional, mechanical, or other skill and responding to a request from a requesting political subdivision shall, while providing assistance during a declared emergency or during an authorized drill or exercise, be considered to be licensed, certified, or permitted in the requesting political subdivision, except as limited by the chief executive officer of the requesting political subdivision.

(2)  Each law enforcement officer rendering aid as provided in this part under the authority of a state of emergency declared by the governor, whether inside or outside the officer's jurisdiction, shall have all law enforcement powers and the same privileges and immunities that the officer has in the officer's own jurisdiction.

(3)  Each employee of a responding political subdivision responding to a request by or giving assistance to a requesting political subdivision as provided in this part:

(a)  is entitled to:

(i)  all applicable workers compensation benefits for injury or death occurring as a result of the employee's participation in the response or assistance; and

(ii)  any additional state or federal benefits available for line of duty injury or death; and

(b)  is, for purposes of liability, considered to be an employee of the requesting political subdivision.

(4)  Each responding political subdivision and its employees are immune from liability arising out of their actions in responding to a request from a requesting political subdivision to the extent provided in Section 63G-7-201.

